Tennessee, session 114, HB1233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-304(a), is amended by
deleting the language “furnish a receipt” and substituting "furnish a written or digital receipt".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-304(a), is amended by
deleting the language “keep a duplicate copy of every receipt” and substituting "keep a duplicate
written or digital copy of every receipt".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1233
003355
- 1 -